Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3803
Franchise tax; rate.

The rate of tax on deposits shall be twelve and three-tenths times the limitation rate as determined in section 77-3804, expressed in cents and rounded to the nearest cent.

Laws 1986, LB 774, § 3.